California statutes. Family Code
(c) If a court of another state has issued a decree or order concerning the custody of a minor who may be the subject of a proceeding for adoption in this state, a court of this state may not exercise jurisdiction over a proceeding for adoption of the minor, unless both
 of the following apply:

(1) The requirements for modifying an order of a court of another state under this part are met, the court of another state does not have jurisdiction over a proceeding for adoption substantially in conformity with paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a), or the court of another state has declined to assume jurisdiction over a proceeding for adoption.

(2) The court of this state has jurisdiction under this section over the proceeding for adoption.

(d) For purposes of subdivisions (b) and (c), “a court of another state” includes, in the case of an Indian child, a tribal court having and exercising jurisdiction over a custody proceeding involving the Indian child.

(e) Nothing in this section shall limit jurisdiction that is otherwise permitted under Part 5 (commencing with Section 7900) of Division 12.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 757, Sec. 3.   (SB 450)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

9212.

(a) Sections 9210 and 9211 apply to interstate adoptions if the prospective adoptive parents reside outside of the state.

(b) This section shall become operative only if Assembly Bill 746 of the 2001–02 Regular Session is enacted. If Assembly Bill 746 is not enacted, the application of Sections 9210 and 9211 is not intended to expand jurisdiction to apply to interstate adoptions if the prospective adoptive parents reside outside of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 90.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. ADOPTION OF ADULTS AND MARRIED MINORS [9300. - 9340.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [9300. - 9307.]

9300.

(a) An adult may be adopted by another adult, including a stepparent, as provided in this part.

(b) A married minor may be adopted in the same manner as an adult under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 266, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9301.

A married person who is not lawfully separated from the person’s spouse may not adopt an adult without the consent of the spouse, provided that the spouse is capable of giving that consent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9302.

(a) A married person who is not lawfully separated from the person’s spouse may not be adopted without the consent of the spouse, provided that the spouse is capable of giving that consent.

(b) The consent of the parents of the proposed adoptee, of the department, or of any other person is not required.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9303.

(a) Except as permitted by the court, upon a finding of good cause, a person shall not adopt more than one unrelated adult pursuant to this part within one year of the person’s adoption of an unrelated adult unless the proposed adoptee is the biological sibling of a person previously adopted pursuant to this part or unless the proposed adoptee is disabled or physically handicapped. An order finding good cause shall be in writing or stated on the record.

(b) Except as permitted by the court, upon a finding of good cause, a person shall not adopt an unrelated adult pursuant to this part within one year of an adoption of another person pursuant to this
 part by the prospective adoptive parent’s spouse unless the proposed adoptee is a biological sibling of a person previously adopted pursuant to this part. An order finding good cause shall be in writing or stated on the record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 478, Sec. 22.   (AB 1756)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9304.

A person adopted pursuant to this part may take the family name of the adoptive parent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9305.

After adoption, the adoptee and the adoptive parent or parents shall sustain towards each other the legal relationship of parent and child and have all the rights and are subject to all the duties of that relationship.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9306.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the birth parents of a person adopted pursuant to this part are, from the time of the adoption, relieved of all parental duties towards, and all responsibility for, the adopted person, and have no right over the adopted person.

(b) If an adult is adopted by the spouse of a birth parent, the parental rights and responsibilities of that birth parent are not affected by the adoption.

(c) An adult being adopted pursuant to this part may waive the termination of the parental duties and responsibilities of an existing parent or parents under
 subdivision (a) by signing a waiver at any time prior to the finalization of the adoption. The waiver may be included in the adoption agreement or in a separate writing filed with the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 192, Sec. 3.   (AB 1373)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

9307.

A hearing with regard to adoption under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 9320) or termination of a parent and child relationship under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 9340) may, in the discretion of the court, be open and public.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Procedure for Adult Adoption [9320. - 9328.]

9320.

(a) An adult may adopt another adult who is younger, except the spouse of the prospective adoptive parent, by an adoption agreement approved by the court, as provided in this chapter.

(b) The adoption agreement shall be in writing, executed by the prospective adoptive parent and the proposed adoptee, and shall state that the parties agree to assume toward each other the legal relationship of parent and child and to have all of the rights and be subject to all of the duties and responsibilities of that relationship.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9321.

(a) The prospective adoptive parent and the proposed adoptee may file in the county in which either person resides a petition for approval of the adoption agreement.

(b) The petition for approval of the adoption agreement shall state all of the following:

(1) The length and nature of the relationship between the prospective adoptive parent and the proposed adoptee.

(2) The degree of kinship, if any.

(3) The reason the adoption is sought.

(4) A statement as to why the adoption would be in the best interest of the prospective adoptive parent, the proposed adoptee, and the public.

(5) The names and addresses of any living birth parents or adult children of the proposed adoptee.

(6) Whether the prospective adoptive parent or the prospective adoptive parent’s spouse has
 previously adopted any other adult and, if so, the name of the adult, together with the date and place of the adoption.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9321.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 9321, a person who is a resident of this state may file a petition for adult adoption with the court in any of the following:

(1) The county in which the prospective adoptive parent resides.

(2) The county in which the proposed adoptee was born or resides at the time the petition was filed.

(3) The county in which an office of the public or private agency that placed the proposed adoptee for foster care or adoption as a minor or dependent child is located.

(b) A petitioner who is not a resident of this state may file a petition for adult adoption
 with the court in a county specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by renumbering Section 9213 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 48.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9322.

When the petition for approval of the adoption agreement is filed, the court clerk shall set the matter for hearing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9323.

The court may require notice of the time and place of the hearing to be served on any other interested person and any interested person may appear and object to the proposed adoption.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9324.

Both the prospective adoptive parent and the proposed adoptee shall appear at the hearing in person, unless the court allows otherwise pursuant to Section 8613.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 159, Sec. 10.   (AB 2495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9325.

No investigation or report to the court by any public officer or agency is required, but the court may require the county probation officer or the department to investigate the circumstances of the proposed adoption and report thereon, with recommendations, to the court before the hearing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9326.

The prospective adoptive parent shall mail or personally serve notice of the hearing and a copy of the petition to the director of the regional center for the developmentally disabled, established pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4620) of Division 4.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and to any living birth parents or adult children of the proposed adoptee, at least 30 days before the day of the hearing on an adoption petition in any case in which both of the following conditions exist:

(a) The proposed adoptee is an adult with developmental disabilities.

(b) The prospective adoptive parent is a provider of board and care, treatment, habilitation, or other services to persons with developmental disabilities or is a spouse or employee of a provider.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9327.

If the prospective adoptive parent is a provider of board and care, treatment, habilitation, or other services to persons with developmental disabilities, or is a spouse or employee of a provider, and seeks to adopt an unrelated adult with developmental disabilities, the regional center for the developmentally disabled notified pursuant to Section 9326 shall file a written report with the court regarding the suitability of the proposed adoption in meeting the needs of the proposed adoptee and regarding any known previous adoption by the prospective adoptive parent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9328.

(a) At the hearing the court shall examine the parties, or the counsel of any party not present in person.

(b) If the court is satisfied that the adoption will be in the best interests of the persons seeking the adoption and in the public interest and that there is no reason why the petition should not be granted, the court shall approve the adoption agreement and make an order of adoption declaring that the person adopted is the child of the adoptive parent. Otherwise, the court shall withhold approval of the agreement and deny the petition.

(c) In determining whether or not the adoption of any person pursuant to this part is in the best interests of the persons seeking the adoption or the public interest, the court may consider evidence, oral or written, whether or not it is in conformity with the Evidence Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Procedure for Terminating Adult Adoption [9340. - 9340.]

9340.

(a) Any person who has been adopted under this part may, upon written notice to the adoptive parent, file a petition to terminate the relationship of parent and child. The petition shall state the name and address of the petitioner, the name and address of the adoptive parent, the date and place of the adoption, and the circumstances upon which the petition is based.

(b) If the adoptive parent consents in writing to the termination, an order terminating the relationship of parent and child may be issued by the court without further notice.

(c) If the adoptive parent does not consent in writing to the termination, a written response shall be filed within 30 days of the date of mailing of the notice, and the matter shall be set for hearing. The court may require an investigation by the county probation officer or the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 14. FAMILY LAW FACILITATOR ACT [10000. - 10015.]

10000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Family Law Facilitator Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 957, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10001.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) Child and spousal support are serious legal obligations. The entry of a child support order is frequently delayed while parents engage in protracted litigation concerning custody and visitation. The current system for obtaining child and spousal support orders is suffering because the family courts are unduly burdened with heavy case loads and do not have sufficient personnel to meet increased demands on the courts.

(2) Reports to the Legislature regarding the family law pilot projects in the Superior Courts of the Counties of Santa Clara and San Mateo indicate that the pilot projects have provided a cost-effective and efficient method for the courts to process family law cases that involve unrepresented litigants with issues concerning child support, spousal support, and health insurance.

(3) The reports to the Legislature
 further indicate that the pilot projects in both counties have been successful in making the process of obtaining court orders concerning child support, spousal support, and health insurance more accessible to unrepresented parties. Surveys conducted by both counties indicate a high degree of satisfaction with the services provided by the pilot projects.

(4) There is a compelling state interest in having a speedy, conflict-reducing system for resolving issues of child support, spousal support, and health insurance that is cost-effective and accessible to families that cannot afford legal representation.

(b) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to make the services provided in the family law pilot projects in the Counties of Santa Clara and San Mateo available to unrepresented parties in the superior courts of all California counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 957, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10002.

Each superior court shall maintain an office of the family law facilitator. The office of the family law facilitator shall be staffed by an attorney licensed to practice law in this state who has mediation or litigation experience, or both, in the field of family law. The family law facilitator shall be appointed by the superior court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 957, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10003.

This division shall apply to all actions or proceedings for temporary or permanent child support, spousal support, health insurance, child custody, or visitation in a proceeding for dissolution of marriage, nullity of marriage, legal separation, or exclusive child custody, or pursuant to the Uniform Parentage Act (Part 3 (commencing with Section 7600) of Division 12) or the Domestic Violence Prevention Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 6200)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 652, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10004.

Services provided by the family law facilitator shall include, but are not limited to, the following: providing educational materials to parents concerning the process of establishing parentage and establishing, modifying, and enforcing child support and spousal support in the courts; distributing necessary court forms and voluntary declarations of paternity; providing assistance in completing forms; preparing support schedules based upon statutory guidelines; and providing referrals to the local child support agency, family court services, and other community agencies and resources that provide services for parents and children. In counties where a family law information center exists, the family law facilitator shall provide assistance on child support issues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 652, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10005.

(a) By local rule, the superior court may designate additional duties of the family law facilitator, which may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Meeting with litigants to mediate issues of child support, spousal support, and maintenance of health insurance, subject to Section 10012. Actions in which one or both of the parties are unrepresented by counsel shall have priority.

(2) Drafting stipulations to include all issues agreed to by the parties, which may include issues other than those specified in Section 10003.

(3) If the parties are
 unable to resolve issues with the assistance of the family law facilitator, prior to or at the hearing, and at the request of the court, the family law facilitator shall review the paperwork, examine documents, prepare support schedules, and advise the judge whether or not the matter is ready to proceed.

(4) Assisting the clerk in maintaining records.

(5) Preparing formal orders consistent with the court’s announced order in cases where both parties are unrepresented.

(6) Serving as a special master in proceedings and making findings to the court unless the family law facilitator has served as a mediator in that case.

(7) Providing the services specified in Section
 10004 concerning the issues of child custody and visitation as they relate to calculating child support, if funding is provided for that purpose.

(b) If staff and other resources are available and the duties listed in subdivision (a) have been accomplished, the duties of the family law facilitator may also include the following:

(1) Assisting the court with research and any other responsibilities that will enable the court to be responsive to the litigants’ needs.

(2) Developing programs for bar and community outreach through day and evening programs, video recordings, and other innovative means that will assist unrepresented and financially disadvantaged litigants in gaining meaningful access to family court.
 These programs shall specifically include information concerning underutilized legislation, such as expedited child support orders (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 3620) of Part 1 of Division 9), and preexisting, court-sponsored programs, such as supervised visitation and appointment of attorneys for children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 138.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10006.

The court shall adopt a protocol wherein all litigants, both unrepresented by counsel and represented by counsel, have ultimate access to a hearing before the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 957, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10007.

The court shall provide the family law facilitator at no cost to the parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 957, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10008.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to a child for whom services are provided or required to be provided by a local child support agency pursuant to Section 17400.

(b) In cases in which the services of the local child support agency are provided pursuant to Section 17400, either parent may utilize the services of the family law facilitator that are specified in Section 10004. In order for a custodial parent who is receiving the services of the local child support agency pursuant to Section 17400 to utilize the services specified in Section 10005 relating to support, the custodial parent must obtain written authorization from the local child support agency. It is not the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to limit the duties of local child support agencies with respect to seeking child support payments or to in any way limit or supersede other provisions of this code
 respecting temporary child support.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 78.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10010.

The Judicial Council shall adopt minimum standards for the office of the family law facilitator and any forms or rules of court that are necessary to implement this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 957, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10011.

The Director of the State Department of Social Services shall seek approval from the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Office of Child Support Enforcement, to utilize funding under Title IV-D of the Social Security Act for the services provided pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 957, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10012.

(a) In a proceeding in which mediation is required pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10005, where there has been a history of domestic violence between the parties or where a protective order as defined in Section 6218 is in effect, at the request of the party alleging domestic violence in a written declaration under penalty of perjury or protected by the order, the family law facilitator shall meet with the parties separately and at separate times.

(b) Any intake form that the office of the family law facilitator requires the parties to complete before the commencement of mediation shall state that, if a party alleging domestic violence in a written declaration under penalty of perjury or a party protected by a protective order so requests, the mediator will meet with the parties separately and at separate times.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 957, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10013.

The family law facilitator shall not represent any party. No attorney-client relationship is created between a party and the family law facilitator as a result of any information or services provided to the party by the family law facilitator. The family law facilitator shall give conspicuous notice that no attorney-client relationship exists between the facilitator, its staff, and the family law litigant. The notice shall include the advice that the absence of an attorney-client relationship means that communications between the party and the family law facilitator are not privileged and that the family law facilitator may provide services to the other party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 652, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10014.

A person employed by, or directly supervised by, the family law facilitator shall not make any public comment about a pending or impending proceeding in the court as provided by paragraph (9) of subdivision (B) of Canon 3 of the Code of Judicial Ethics. All persons employed by or directly supervised by the family law facilitator shall be provided a copy of paragraph (9) of subdivision (B) of Canon 3 of the Code of Judicial Ethics, and shall be required to sign an acknowledgment that the person is aware of its provisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 139.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10015.

The Judicial Council shall create any necessary forms to advise the parties of the types of services provided, that there is no attorney-client relationship, that the family law facilitator is not responsible for the outcome of any case, that the family law facilitator does not represent any party and will not appear in court on the party’s behalf, and that the other party may also be receiving information and services from the family law facilitator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 652, Sec. 15.5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 17. SUPPORT SERVICES [17000. - 17804.]



CHAPTER 1. Department of Child Support Services [17000. - 17393.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [17000. - 17000.]

17000.

The definitions contained in this section, and definitions applicable to Division 9 (commencing with Section 3500), shall govern the construction of this division, unless the context requires otherwise.

(a) “Child support debt” means the amount of money owed as child support pursuant to a court order.

(b) “Child support order” means a court order for the payment of a set or determinable amount of support by a parent or a court order requiring a parent to provide for health insurance coverage. “Child support order” includes any court order for spousal support or for medical support to the extent these
 obligations are to be enforced by a single state agency for child support under Title IV-D.

(c) “Court” means any superior court of this state and any court or tribunal of another state that has jurisdiction to determine the liability of persons for the support of another person.

(d) “Court order” means a judgment, decree, or order of any court of this state that orders the payment of a set or determinable amount of support by a parent. It does not include any order or decree of any proceeding in which a court did not order support.

(e) “Department” means the Department of Child Support Services.

(f) “Dependent child” means any of the following:

(1) Any person under 18 years of age who is not emancipated, self-supporting, married, or a member of the Armed Forces of the United States.

(2) Any unmarried person who is at least 18 years of age but who has not reached 19 years of age, is not emancipated, and is a student regularly attending high school or a program of vocational or technical training designed to train that person for gainful employment.

(g) “Director” means the Director of Child Support Services or an authorized representative.

(h) “Local child support agency” means the county department
 of child support services created pursuant to this chapter and with which the department has entered into a cooperative agreement, to secure child and spousal support, medical support, and determine paternity. Local child support agency includes county programs in multiple counties that have been consolidated into a single agency pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17304.

(i) “Parent” means the natural or adoptive father or mother of a dependent child, and includes any person who has an enforceable obligation to support a dependent child.

(j) “Public assistance” means any amount paid under the California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code), or any Medi-Cal
 benefit, for the benefit of any dependent child or the caretaker of a child.

(k) “Public assistance debt” means any amount paid under the California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids Act, contained in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, for the benefit of a dependent child or the caretaker of a child for whom the department is authorized to seek recoupment under this division, subject to applicable federal law.

(l) “Title IV-D” or “IV-D” means Part D of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 651 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 140.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Organization [17200. - 17212.]

17200.

The Department of Child Support Services is hereby created within the California Health and Human Services Agency. The department shall administer all services and perform all functions necessary to establish, collect, and distribute child support.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 478, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17202.

(a) The department is hereby designated the single organizational unit whose duty it shall be to administer the Title IV-D state plan for securing child and spousal support, medical support, and determining paternity. State plan functions shall be performed by other agencies as required by law, by delegation of the department, or by cooperative agreements.

(b) The department shall appoint the local child support agency, as defined in Section 17304, or any other entity receiving federal tax information in performance of its child support duties as its designee for purposes of paragraph (26) of subdivision (b) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(c) For purposes
 of this section, “federal tax information” is as defined in Section 1044 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 19, Sec. 7.   (AB 111)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

17204.

The department consists of the director and such division or other administrative units as the director may find necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 478, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17206.

The department shall ensure that there is an adequate organizational structure and sufficient staff to perform functions delegated to any governmental unit relating to Part D (commencing with Section 651) of Subchapter 4 of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code, including a sufficient number of attorneys to ensure that all requirements of due process are satisfied in the establishment and enforcement of child support orders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 478, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17208.

(a) The department shall reduce the cost of, and increase the speed and efficiency of, child support enforcement operations. It is the intent of the Legislature to operate the child support enforcement program through local child support agencies without a net increase in state General Fund or county general fund costs, considering all increases to the General Fund as a result of increased collections and welfare recoupment.

(b) The department shall maximize the use of federal funds available for the costs of administering a child support services department, and to the maximum extent feasible, obtain funds from federal financial incentives for the efficient collection of child support, to defray the remaining costs of
 administration of the department consistent with effective and efficient support enforcement.

(c) Effective October 1, 2019, the Department of Child Support Services shall impose an administrative service fee in the amount of thirty-five dollars ($35) on a never-assisted custodial party receiving services from the California child support program for order establishment, enforcement, and collection services provided. The annual amount of child support payments collected on behalf of the custodial party must be five hundred fifty dollars ($550) or more before an administrative service fee is imposed pursuant to this subdivision. The fee shall be deducted from the custodial party’s collection payment at the time the collection payments for that year have reached levels specified by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 4.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

17210.

The department shall ensure that the local child support agency offices and services are reasonably accessible throughout the counties, and shall establish systems for informing the public, including custodial and noncustodial parents of dependent children, of its services and operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 478, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17211.

The department shall administer the Child Support Assurance Demonstration Project established by Article 5 (commencing with Section 18241) of Chapter 3.3 of Part 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and the county demonstration projects to provide employment and training services to nonsupporting noncustodial parents authorized by Section 18205.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. However, the department may contract with the State Department of Social Services to continue development and implementation of these demonstration projects until they have been fully implemented. After the demonstration projects have been fully implemented, the department shall consult with the State Department of Social Services on the administration of the projects. The contracts for evaluation of the demonstration projects shall continue to be maintained by the State Department of Social Services. The department shall be responsible for the final evaluation of the projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 480, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17212.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to protect individual rights of privacy, and to facilitate and enhance the effectiveness of the child and spousal support enforcement program, by ensuring the confidentiality of support enforcement and child abduction records, and to thereby encourage the full and frank disclosure of information relevant to all of the following:

(1) The establishment or maintenance of parent and child relationships and support obligations.

(2) The enforcement of the child support liability of absent parents.

(3) The enforcement of spousal
 support liability of the spouse or former spouse to the extent required by the state plan under Section 17604 and Part 6 (commencing with Section 5700.101) of Division 9.

(4) The location of absent parents.

(5) The location of parents and children abducted, concealed, or detained by them.

(b) (1) (A) Except as provided in subdivision (c), all files, applications, papers, documents, and records established or maintained by a public entity pursuant to the administration and implementation of the child and spousal support enforcement program established pursuant to Part D (commencing with Section 651) of Subchapter IV of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code and
 this division, shall be confidential, and shall not be open to examination or released for disclosure for any purpose not directly connected with the administration of the child and spousal support enforcement program. A public entity shall not disclose any file, application, paper, document, or record, or the information contained therein, except as expressly authorized by this section.

(B) For purposes of this section, “public entity” does not include the court. This subparagraph is declaratory of existing law.

(2) Information shall not be released or the whereabouts of one party or the child disclosed to another party, or to the attorney of any other party, if a protective order has been issued by a court or administrative agency with respect to the party, a good cause claim under
 Section 11477.04 of the Welfare and Institutions Code has been approved or is pending, or the public agency responsible for establishing paternity or enforcing support has reason to believe that the release of the information may result in physical or emotional harm to the party or the child. When a local child support agency is prohibited from releasing information pursuant to this subdivision, the information shall be omitted from any pleading or document to be submitted to the court and this subdivision shall be cited in the pleading or other document as the authority for the omission. The information shall be released only upon an order of the court pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (c).

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, a proof of service filed by the local child support agency shall not disclose the address where service of
 process was accomplished. Instead, the local child support agency shall keep the address in its own records. The proof of service shall specify that the address is on record at the local child support agency and that the address may be released only upon an order from the court pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (c). The local child support agency shall, upon request by a party served, release to that person the address where service was effected.

(c) Disclosure of the information described in subdivision (b) is authorized as follows:

(1) All files, applications, papers, documents, and records as described in subdivision (b) shall be available and may be used by a public entity for all administrative, civil, or criminal investigations, actions, proceedings, or prosecutions
 conducted in connection with the administration of the child and spousal support enforcement program approved under Part D (commencing with Section 651) of Subchapter IV of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code and to the county welfare department responsible for administering a program operated under a state plan pursuant to Part A, Subpart 1 or 2 of Part B, or Part E of Subchapter IV of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) A document requested by a person who wrote, prepared, or furnished the document may be examined by or disclosed to that person or a designee.

(3) The payment history of an obligor pursuant to a support order may be examined by or released to the court, the obligor, or the person on whose behalf enforcement actions are being taken or
 that person’s designee.

(4) An income and expense declaration of either parent may be released to the other parent for the purpose of establishing or modifying a support order.

(5) Public records subject to disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) may be released.

(6) After a noticed motion and a finding by the court, in a case in which establishment or enforcement actions are being taken, that release or disclosure to the obligor or obligee is required by due process of law, the court may order a public entity that possesses an application, paper, document, or record as described in subdivision (b) to make that item available to